New Jersey, session 222, S3278.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2015, c.89 (C.2A:4A-26.1), the court shall waive jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case without the juveniles consent and shall refer the case to the appropriate court and prosecuting authority having jurisdiction if: (1)   the juvenile was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged delinquent act; (2)   there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile committed a delinquent act which if committed by an adult would constitute criminal homicide, other than death by auto; and (3)   there is probable cause to believe the juvenile engaged in conduct directed at the victim of the criminal homicide, other than death by auto, which is prohibited pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10). b.    The court shall conduct a hearing to receive evidence offered by the State and by the juvenile.  The State shall provide proof to satisfy the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection a. of this section. c.     Testimony of a juvenile at a hearing to determine referral under this section shall not be admissible for any purpose in any subsequent hearing to determine delinquency or guilt of any offense. d.    Upon waiver of jurisdiction and referral to the appropriate court and prosecuting authority having jurisdiction: (1)   the case shall proceed as if it originated in that court and shall be subject to the sentencing provisions available to that court; provided, however, upon conviction for the offense which is subject to waiver pursuant to subsection a. of this section, there shall be a presumption that the juvenile shall serve any custodial sentence imposed in a State juvenile facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission until the juvenile reaches the age of 21, except that: (a)   a juvenile who has not reached the age of 21 may, in the discretion of the Youth Justice Commission, be transferred to the Department of Corrections in accordance with the plan established pursuant to subsection e. of section 7 of P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-175) and regulations adopted pursuant to that section; and (b)   a juvenile who has reached or exceeds the age of 21 may continue to serve a sentence in a State juvenile facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission in the discretion of the Youth Justice Commission and if the juvenile consents; otherwise the juvenile shall serve the remainder of the custodial sentence in a State correctional facility; (2)   if a juvenile is not convicted of the offense set forth in subsection a. of this section, a conviction for any other offense shall be deemed a juvenile adjudication and be remanded to the Superior Court, Chancery Division, Family Part for disposition, in accordance with the dispositional options available to that court and all records related to the act of delinquency shall be subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1982, c.79 (C.2A:4A-60). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.